Utah statutes.
31A-22-610.2.   Maternity stay minimum limits.

(1) (a)  If an insured has coverage for maternity benefits, the policy may not be limited to a less than a 48-hour benefit for both mother and newborn with a normal vaginal delivery.

(b)  If an insured has coverage for maternity benefits, the policy may not be limited to a less than 96-hour benefit for both mother and newborn with a caesarean section delivery.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies to an accident and health insurer who offers maternity coverage.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

